Nebraska, session 109, LB1104.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1104 LB1104
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 60-362, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-362 (1) Unless otherwise expressly provided, no motor vehicle
shall be operated or parked and no trailer shall be towed or parked on
the highways of this state unless the motor vehicle or trailer is
registered in accordance with the Motor Vehicle Registration Act. There
shall be a rebuttable presumption that any motor vehicle or trailer
stored and kept more than thirty days in the state is being operated,
parked, or towed on the highways of this state, and such motor vehicle or
trailer shall be registered in accordance with the act, from the date of
title of the motor vehicle or trailer or, if no transfer in ownership of
the motor vehicle or trailer has occurred, from the expiration of the
last registration period for which the motor vehicle or trailer was
registered. No motor vehicle or trailer shall be eligible for initial
registration in this state, except a motor vehicle or trailer registered
or eligible to be registered as part of a fleet of apportionable vehicles
under section 60-3,198, unless the Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act
has been complied with insofar as the motor vehicle or trailer is
concerned.
(2) The Department of Motor Vehicles or the Department of Revenue
may make a determination that a resident owner of a motor vehicle or
trailer is avoiding any motor vehicle tax, motor vehicle fee,
registration fee, or sales or use tax. Such determination may be made
based on any of the following factors:
(a) The resident owner does not own property in another state where
the motor vehicle or trailer has been registered;
(b) The resident owner does not maintain a physical location in
another state where the motor vehicle or trailer has been registered; or
(c) The resident owner has not filed a state income tax return in
another state where the motor vehicle or trailer has been registered.
(3) The Department of Motor Vehicles or the Department of Revenue
-2-

LB1104 LB1104
2026 2026
may make a determination that a motor vehicle or trailer has been kept
for more than thirty days in this state and has situs in this state. Such
determination may be made based on any of the following factors:
(a) A Nebraska resident was the initial purchaser of the motor
vehicle or trailer;
(b) A Nebraska resident operated or stored the motor vehicle or
trailer in this state for any period of time;
(c) A Nebraska resident is a member, partner, or shareholder of or
is otherwise affiliated with a limited liability company, partnership,
corporation, or other business entity that is purported to own the motor
vehicle or trailer;
(d) A Nebraska resident is covered under an insurance policy for the
motor vehicle or trailer; or
(e) Any evidence that the motor vehicle or trailer has been kept for
more than thirty days in this state and has situs in this state.
(4) If the Department of Motor Vehicles or the Department of Revenue
makes the determinations described in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, there is a rebuttable presumption that:
(a) The Nebraska resident is the actual owner of the motor vehicle
or trailer;
(b) The Nebraska resident is required to register the motor vehicle
or trailer in this state and is liable for all motor vehicle taxes, motor
vehicle fees, and registration fees that are required under the Motor
Vehicle Registration Act; and
(c) The purchase of the motor vehicle or trailer is subject to sales
or use tax under section 77-2703.
(5) If determinations are made under subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, the Department of Motor Vehicles or the Department of Revenue
shall notify the Nebraska resident who is presumed to be the owner of the
motor vehicle or trailer that such resident is required to register the
motor vehicle or trailer in this state, pay any applicable taxes and fees
-3-

LB1104 LB1104
2026 2026
for proper registration of the motor vehicle and trailer under the Motor
Vehicle Registration Act, and pay any applicable sales or use tax due on
the purchase under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 no later than thirty
days after the notice is delivered to such resident.
(6) If the Department of Motor Vehicles makes the determinations
under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the Nebraska resident who
is presumed to be the owner of the motor vehicle or trailer may accept
such determinations and pay the taxes and fees provided in the notice, or
he or she may dispute the determinations and appeal the matter. Such
appeal shall be filed with the Director of Motor Vehicles within thirty
days after the notice was delivered to the resident or the determinations
will be final. The director shall appoint a hearing officer who shall
hear the appeal and issue a written decision. Such appeal shall be in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. Following the final
determination of the appeal in favor of the Department of Motor Vehicles
or if no further appeal is filed, the resident shall owe the taxes and
fees determined to be due, together with any reasonable costs for the
appeal assessed against the owner.
(7) If the Department of Revenue makes the determinations under
subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the Nebraska resident who is
presumed to be the owner of the motor vehicle or trailer may appeal the
determination made by the Department of Revenue, and such appeal shall be
in accordance with section 77-2709.
(8) If the Nebraska resident who is presumed to be the owner of the
motor vehicle or trailer does not pay the motor vehicle taxes, motor
vehicle fees, registration fees, or sales or use tax required to be paid
under this section, such resident shall be assessed a late fee of fifty
percent of the unpaid taxes and fees. Such late fee shall be remitted to
the State Treasurer for credit to the Highway Trust Fund.
(9) In addition to any penalty that is provided under this section,
a violation of this section is subject to the penalty provided under
-4-

LB1104 LB1104
2026 2026
sections 60-3,164 and 60-3,170.
Sec. 2. Section 60-3,164, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-3,164 (1) Any person who operates or parks a motor vehicle or who
tows or parks a trailer on any highway, which motor vehicle or trailer
has not been registered as required by section 60-362, shall be subject
to the penalty provided in sections 60-362 and section 60-3,170.
(2) A person who parks a motor vehicle or tows a trailer on any
highway, which motor vehicle or trailer has been properly registered in
this state but such registration has expired, shall not be in violation
of this section or section 60-362 or subject to the penalty provided in
sections 60-362 and section 60-3,170, unless thirty days have passed from
the expiration of the prior registration.
Sec. 3. Original sections 60-362 and 60-3,164, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-5-